Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20192-2643.02
License holder; duties.

A license holder shall comply with the Pesticide Act, the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, and any order of the director issued pursuant to the act. A license holder shall not interfere with the department in the performance of its duties. A license holder acting as a supervisor to a noncertified applicator is required to comply with the requirements of subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section 2-2642.

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 16.
September 1, 2019